Utah statutes.
17B-2a-106.   Appointment of board of trustees members -- Vacancies.

(1)  If the area of a cemetery maintenance district is included entirely within the boundaries of a single municipality, each member of its board of trustees shall be appointed and each vacancy on the board of trustees shall be filled by a person appointed by the legislative body of that municipality, as provided in Section 17B-1-304.

(2)  For each other cemetery maintenance district, each member of its board of trustees shall be appointed and each vacancy on the board of trustees shall be filled by a person appointed by the legislative body of the county in which the district is located, as provided in Section 17B-1-304.

